Hawaii statutes.
§183D-65 Posting; destruction of predators.
(a) On any game management area, public hunting area, or forest reserve or
other lands under the jurisdiction of the department, predators deemed harmful
to wildlife by the department may be destroyed by any means deemed necessary by
the department.

(b) Where the predators are dogs and the
methods of destruction may endanger pets or hunting dogs, all major points of
entrance into the area where the predators are to be destroyed shall be posted
with signs indicating that a program of predator destruction in the area is in
progress. Any predator may be destroyed in a posted area without claim or
penalty whether or not the predator is the property of some person. [L 1985, c
174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next